Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.516

Effect of dissociation as limited partner.

(1) Upon a person's dissociation as a limited partner:

(a) Subject to RCW 25.10.561, the person does not have further rights as a limited partner;

(b) The person's obligation of good faith and fair dealing as a limited partner under RCW 25.10.341(2) continues only as to matters arising and events occurring before the dissociation; and

(c) Subject to RCW 25.10.561 and article 11 of this chapter, any transferable interest owned by the person in the person's capacity as a limited partner immediately before dissociation is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

(2) A person's dissociation as a limited partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners that the person incurred while a limited partner.

[ 2009 c 188 s 602.]